District of Columbia statutes.
18-709

Persons authorized to act in relation to international will; eligibility; recognition by authorizing agency.

Individuals who have been admitted to practice law before the courts of the District of Columbia and who are in good standing as active law practitioners in the District, are hereby declared to be authorized persons in relation to international wills.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 102(b), 48 DCR 2087
This section is referenced in § 18-701.